Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1144.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 32-2242, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE32-2242. Application for certification as veterinary technician; qualifications; definition A. A person desiring to be certified as a veterinary technician shall apply in writing to the board on a form furnished by the board. B. The applicant shall be at least eighteen years of age and shall furnish either: 1. Satisfactory evidence of graduation from a two-year curriculum in veterinary technology, or the equivalent of such graduation as determined by the board, in a nonprofit organization, college or other institution approved by the board. 2. A record of working for at least four thousand hours within six years under the direct supervision of a veterinarian who is licensed in this state, during which time the applicant learned skills pursuant to the veterinary technology student essential and recommended skills list prescribed by a national nonprofit organization for veterinarians that prescribes and enforces standards for veterinary education. An applicant who satisfies the requirements for the alternative supervised work route of certification is eligible to take the veterinary technician national examination and any state examination for veterinary technicians approved by the board.  The supervised work must include: (a) A description of the skill or skills the applicant developed. (b) The affidavit of the responsible veterinarian. C. The application shall be accompanied by the application and examination fee established by the board. D. Before beginning any supervised work, the responsible veterinarian shall provide to the board on a form approved by the board the following information: 1. The name of the applicant. 2. The name of the responsible veterinarian. 3. The location of the premises at which the supervised work will occur. 4. A description of the training that will be provided to the applicant to meet the requirements of this section. D. E. An applicant from another state is not required to retake the veterinary technician national examination if the applicant can provide all of the following: 1. Proof that the applicant's original score meets the minimum score required by the board. 2. Proof that the applicant holds an active license in good standing in another state or in Canada. 3. Proof of employment as a veterinary technician in two of the preceding four years or four of the preceding seven years. F. For the purposes of this section, "responsible veterinarian" means a veterinarian who is licensed in this state and who is responsible for the supervised work of an applicant for certification under this section and for any veterinarians who provide direct supervision of the applicant. END_STATUTE